Utah statutes.
58-31b-102.   Definitions.
In addition to the definitions in Section 58-1-102, as used in this chapter:
(1)  "Administrative penalty" means a monetary fine or citation imposed by the
division for acts or omissions determined to constitute unprofessional or
unlawful conduct in accordance with a fine schedule established by rule and as
a result of an adjudicative proceeding conducted in accordance with Title 63G,
Chapter 4, Administrative Procedures Act.
(2)  "Applicant" means a person who applies for licensure or certification
under this chapter by submitting a completed application for licensure or
certification and the required fees to the department.
(3)  "Approved education program" means a nursing education program that meets
the minimum standards for educational programs established under this chapter
and by division rule in collaboration with the board.
(4)  "Board" means the Board of Nursing created in Section 58-31b-201.
(5)  "Consultation and referral plan" means a written plan jointly developed
by an advanced practice registered nurse and a consulting physician that
permits the advanced practice registered nurse to prescribe schedule II-III
controlled substances in consultation with the consulting physician.
(6)  "Consulting physician" means a physician and surgeon or osteopathic
physician and surgeon licensed in accordance with this title who has agreed to
consult with an advanced practice registered nurse with a controlled substance
license, a DEA registration number, and who will be prescribing schedule II-
III controlled substances.
(7)  "Diagnosis" means the identification of and discrimination between
physical and psychosocial signs and symptoms essential to the effective
execution and management of health care.
(8)  "Examinee" means a person who applies to take or does take any
examination required under this chapter for licensure.
(9)  "Licensee" means a person who is licensed or certified under this
chapter.
(10)  "Long-term care facility" means any of the following facilities licensed
by the Department of Health pursuant to Title 26, Chapter 21, Health Care
Facility Licensing and Inspection Act:
(a)  a nursing care facility;
(b)  a small health care facility;
(c)  an intermediate care facility for the mentally retarded;
(d)  an assisted living facility Type I or II; or
(e)  a designated swing bed unit in a general hospital.
(11)  "Medication aide certified" means a certified nurse aide who:
(a)  has a minimum of 2,000 hours experience working as a certified nurse
aide;
(b)  has received a minimum of 60 hours of classroom and 40 hours of practical
training that is approved by the division in collaboration with the board, in
administering routine medications to patients or residents of long-term care
facilities; and
(c)  is certified by the division as a medication aide certified.
(12) (a)  "Practice as a medication aide certified" means the limited practice
of nursing under the supervision, as defined by the division by administrative
rule, of a licensed nurse, involving routine patient care that requires
minimal or limited specialized or general knowledge, judgment, and skill, to
an individual who is ill, injured, infirm, developmentally or physically
disabled, mentally disabled, or mentally retarded, and who is in a regulated
long-term care facility.
(b)  "Practice as a medication aide certified":
(i)  includes:
(A)  providing direct personal assistance or care; and
(B)  administering routine medications to patients in accordance with a
formulary and protocols to be defined by the division by rule; and
(ii)  does not include assisting a resident of an assisted living facility, a
long term care facility, or an intermediate care facility for the mentally
retarded to self administer a medication, as regulated by the Department of
Health by administrative rule.
(13)  "Practice of advanced practice registered nursing" means the practice of
nursing within the generally recognized scope and standards of advanced
practice registered nursing as defined by rule and consistent with
professionally recognized preparation and education standards of an advanced
practice registered nurse by a person licensed under this chapter as an
advanced practice registered nurse.  Advanced practice registered nursing
includes:
(a)  maintenance and promotion of health and prevention of disease;
(b)  diagnosis, treatment, correction, consultation, and referral for common
health problems;
(c)  prescription or administration of prescription drugs or devices
including:
(i)  local anesthesia;
(ii)  schedule IV-V controlled substances; and
(iii)  schedule II-III controlled substances in accordance with a consultation
and referral plan; or
(d)  the provision of preoperative, intraoperative, and postoperative
anesthesia care and related services upon the request of a licensed health
care professional by an advanced practice registered nurse specializing as a
certified registered nurse anesthetist, including:
(i)  preanesthesia preparation and evaluation including:
(A)  performing a preanesthetic assessment of the patient;
(B)  ordering and evaluating appropriate lab and other studies to determine
the health of the patient; and
(C)  selecting, ordering, or administering appropriate medications;
(ii)  anesthesia induction, maintenance, and emergence, including:
(A)  selecting and initiating the planned anesthetic technique;
(B)  selecting and administering anesthetics and adjunct drugs and fluids; and
(C)  administering general, regional, and local anesthesia;
(iii)  postanesthesia follow-up care, including:
(A)  evaluating the patient's response to anesthesia and implementing
corrective actions; and
(B)  selecting, ordering, or administering the medications and studies listed
in Subsection (13)(d); and
(iv)  other related services within the scope of practice of a certified
registered nurse anesthetist, including:
(A)  emergency airway management;
(B)  advanced cardiac life support; and
(C)  the establishment of peripheral, central, and arterial invasive lines;
and
(v)  for purposes of Subsection (13)(d), "upon the request of a licensed
health care professional":
(A)  means a health care professional practicing within the scope of the
health care professional's license, requests anesthesia services for a
specific patient; and
(B)  does not require an advanced practice registered nurse specializing as a
certified registered nurse anesthetist to enter into a consultation and
referral plan or obtain additional authority to select, administer, or provide
preoperative, intraoperative, or postoperative anesthesia care and services.
(14)  "Practice of nursing" means assisting individuals or groups to maintain
or attain optimal health, implementing a strategy of care to accomplish
defined goals and evaluating responses to care and treatment.  The practice of
nursing requires substantial specialized or general knowledge, judgment, and
skill based upon principles of the biological, physical, behavioral, and
social sciences, and includes:
(a)  initiating and maintaining comfort measures;
(b)  promoting and supporting human functions and responses;
(c)  establishing an environment conducive to well-being;
(d)  providing health counseling and teaching;
(e)  collaborating with health care professionals on aspects of the health
care regimen;
(f)  performing delegated procedures only within the education, knowledge,
judgment, and skill of the licensee; and
(g)  delegating nurse interventions that may be performed by others and are
not in conflict with this chapter.
(15)  "Practice of practical nursing" means the performance of nursing acts in
the generally recognized scope of practice of licensed practical nurses as
defined by rule and as provided in this Subsection (15) by a person licensed
under this chapter as a licensed practical nurse and under the direction of a
registered nurse, licensed physician, or other specified health care
professional as defined by rule.  Practical nursing acts include:
(a)  contributing to the assessment of the health status of individuals and
groups;
(b)  participating in the development and modification of the strategy of
care;
(c)  implementing appropriate aspects of the strategy of care;
(d)  maintaining safe and effective nursing care rendered to a patient
directly or indirectly; and
(e)  participating in the evaluation of responses to interventions.
(16)  "Practice of registered nursing" means performing acts of nursing as
provided in this Subsection (16) by a person licensed under this chapter as a
registered nurse within the generally recognized scope of practice of
registered nurses as defined by rule.  Registered nursing acts include:
(a)  assessing the health status of individuals and groups;
(b)  identifying health care needs;
(c)  establishing goals to meet identified health care needs;
(d)  planning a strategy of care;
(e)  prescribing nursing interventions to implement the strategy of care;
(f)  implementing the strategy of care;
(g)  maintaining safe and effective nursing care that is rendered to a patient
directly or indirectly;
(h)  evaluating responses to interventions;
(i)  teaching the theory and practice of nursing; and
(j)  managing and supervising the practice of nursing.
(17)  "Routine medications":
(a)  means established medications administered to a medically stable
individual as determined by a licensed health care practitioner or in
consultation with a licensed medical practitioner; and
(b)  is limited to medications that are administered by the following routes:
(i)  oral;
(ii)  sublingual;
(iii)  buccal;
(iv)  eye;
(v)  ear;
(vi)  nasal;
(vii)  rectal;
(viii)  vaginal;
(ix)  skin ointments, topical including patches and transdermal;
(x)  premeasured medication delivered by aerosol/nebulizer; and
(xi)  medications delivered by metered hand-held inhalers.
(18)  "Unlawful conduct" is as defined in Sections 58-1-501 and 58-31b-501.
(19)  "Unlicensed assistive personnel" means any unlicensed person, regardless
of title, to whom tasks are delegated by a licensed nurse as permitted by rule
and in accordance with the standards of the profession.
(20)  "Unprofessional conduct" is as defined in Sections 58-1-501 and
58-31b-502 and as may be further defined by rule.
